Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8210
Examinations.

The director may examine the financial condition, affairs, and management of any applicant or captive insurer pursuant to the Insurers Examination Act.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 44.

Insurers Examination Act, see section 44-5901.